Hawaii, session 2026, GM1357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HA WAIL­
SECTION 1. Section 431:19-108, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
”(a) The commissioner or any authorized examiner may
conduct an examination, investigation, or financial surveillance
of any captive insurance company as often as the commissioner
deems appropriate; provided that, unless the commissioner
requires otherwise:
(1) [An examination shall bo conducted at least once every
five years for all captive insurance companies,—except
as provided in paragraph—^2^-;—and] Except as provided
in paragraph (2), each captive insurance company,
other than a risk retention captive insurance company,
shall be subject to an examination no later than five
years after licensure. Thereafter, until December 31,
2031, the captive insurance company shall be subject
to examination at the discretion of the commissioner;
provided that on or after January 1, 2032, each
2026-2476 SB2043 GDI SMA.docx 1
IMilllilllllllllHIifflllll

Page 2 S.B. NO 2043
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
captive insurance company shall be subject to
examination at least once every five years; and
(2) An examination of a risk retention captive insurance
company shall be conducted no later than three years
after its formation and at least once every five years
thereafter.
The commissioner or any authorized examiner shall
thoroughly inspect and examine the captive insurance company's
affairs to ascertain its financial condition, its ability to
fulfill its obligations, and whether it has complied with this
article."
SECTION 2. The insurance commissioner shall submit a
report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of the regular session of 2031 that evaluates the
effectiveness of the discretionary examination framework
established by this Act. The report shall include but not be
limited to:
(1) An assessment of whether the discretionary examination
approach adequately protects policyholders and ensures
the financial condition and regulatory compliance of
captive insurance companies;
2026-2476 SB2043 CDl SMA.docx 2
iimiiiiiiiiiniiiiHMili

Page 3 S.B. NO. sr,
C.D. 1
(2) A comparison of examination frequency, costs, and
resource allocation before and after the
implementation of this Act; and
(3) Any modifications, including whether to continue,
modify, or repeal the discretionary examination
framework.
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2476 SB2043 CDl SMA.docx 3
lililililMIBINNIIIM

2043
S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 14th day of July , 2026
I
w
o
b
o
b
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I

S.B. No. 2043, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
46-26

SB No. 2043, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives